test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ashchems_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ащемс: # Verb 'to be, be situated' - full paradigm
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ащен
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ащет
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ащей
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: ащетама
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: ащетада
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ащейхть

     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ащень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ащеть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ащесь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ащеме
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ащеде
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ащесть
     
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1: ащелень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2: ащелеть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3: ащель
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1: ащелеме
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2: ащеледе
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3: ащельхть
     
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: ащек
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: ащеда
     
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg1: ащезан
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg2: ащезат
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: ащеза
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl1: ащестама
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl2: ащестада
     ащемс+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: ащест

#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащесамак
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащесамань
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащесамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащесамазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащетя
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащетанза
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащетядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащетядязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащеса
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащесак
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащесы
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащесаськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащесасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащесазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащесамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащесамазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащесамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащесамазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащетядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащетядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащетядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащетядязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащесайне
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащесайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащесыне
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащесаськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащесасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащесазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащемайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащемань
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащейхтень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащензе
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащедязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащедязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащейне
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащейть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащезе
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащемазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащедязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащедязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащедязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащедязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащейне
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащейть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащезень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащелемайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащелемань
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащелемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащелийхтень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащелензе
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащеледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащелине
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащелить
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащелезе
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащелеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащелесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащелезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащелемазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащелемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащеледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащелине
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащелить
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащелезень
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащелеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащелесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Ind+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащелезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: ащек
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: ащеда
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащемак
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащек
     ащемс+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащесть
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащендярясамак
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащендярясамань
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащендярясамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащендярясамазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащендярятя
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащендярятанза
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащендярятядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащендярятядязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащендяряса
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащендярясак
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащендярясы
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащендярясаськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащендярясасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащендярясазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащендярясамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащендярясамазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащендярясамасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащендярясамазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащендярятядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащендярятядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащендярятядязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащендярятядязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащендярясайне
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащендярясайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащендярясыне
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащендярясаськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащендярясасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащендярясазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащелемайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащелемань
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащелемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащелийхтень
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащелензе
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащеледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащелине
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащелить
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащелезе
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащелеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащелесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащелезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащелемазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащелемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащелемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащеледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащеледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащелине
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащелить
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащелезень
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащелеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащелесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащелезь
#

     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащендярялемайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащендярялемань
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащендярялемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащендярялемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащендярялийхтень
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащендярялензе
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащендяряледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащендяряледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащендярялине
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащендярялить
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащендярялезе
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащендярялеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащендярялесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащендярялезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащендярялемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащендярялемазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащендярялемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащендярялемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащендяряледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащендяряледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащендяряледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащендяряледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащендярялине
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащендярялить
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащендярялезень
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащендярялеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащендярялесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащендярялезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: ащелексолемайть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: ащелексолемань
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: ащелексолемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: ащелексолемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: ащелексолийхтень
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: ащелексолензе
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: ащелексоледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: ащелексоледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: ащелексолине
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: ащелексолить
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: ащелексолезе
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: ащелексолеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: ащелексолесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: ащелексолезь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: ащелексолемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: ащелексолемазь
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: ащелексолемасть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: ащелексолемазь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: ащелексоледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: ащелексоледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: ащелексоледязь
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: ащелексоледязь
#
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: ащелексолине
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: ащелексолить
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: ащелексолезень
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: ащелексолеськ
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: ащелексолесть
     ащемс+V+IV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: ащелексолезь
#
